intl/locales/ta/hyphenation/hyph_ta.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
2‍2
1‌1
1அ1
1ஆ1
1இ1
1ஈ1
1உ1
1ஊ1
1எ1
1ஏ1
1ஐ1
1ஒ1
1ஓ1
1ஔ1
ா1
ி1
ீ1
ு1
ூ1
ெ1
ே1
ை1
ொ1
ோ1
ௌ1
1க
1ங
1ச
1ஜ
1ஞ
1ட
1ண
1த
1ந
1ப
1ம
1ய
1ர
1ற
1ல
1ள
1ழ
1வ
1ஷ
1ஸ
1ஹ
2க்1
2ங்1
2ச்1
2ஞ்1
2ட்1
2ண்1
2த்1
2ன்1
2ந்1
2ப்1
2ம்1
2ய்1
2ர்1
2ற்1
2ல்1
2ள்1
2ழ்1
2வ்1
2ஷ்1
2ஸ்1
2ஹ்1
2ஂ1
2ஃ1
2ௗ1
2்1
